Utah statutes.
58-79-201.   Board.

(1)  There is created the Hunting Guides and Outfitters Licensing Board consisting of three persons licensed in accordance with this chapter, one member of the Wildlife Board selected by the Wildlife Board, and one person appointed by the Wildlife Board.

(2)  Except for the two members selected by the Wildlife Board, the board shall be appointed and serve in accordance with Section 58-1-201.

(3) (a)  The duties and responsibilities of the board shall be in accordance with Sections 58-1-202 and 58-1-203.

(b)  The board shall also:

(i)  designate one of its members on a permanent or rotating basis to assist the division in reviewing complaints concerning the unlawful or unprofessional conduct of hunting guides and outfitters; and

(ii)  advise the division in its investigations of these complaints.

(4)  A board member who has, under Subsection (3)(b), reviewed a complaint or advised in its investigation may be disqualified from participating with the board when the board serves as a presiding officer in an adjudicative proceeding concerning the complaint.



Enacted by Chapter 52, 2009 General Session

